Connecticut, session 2026, SB00372.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 19a-421 of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No person shall establish, conduct or maintain a youth camp
without a license issued by the office. Applications for such license shall
be made in writing at least thirty days prior to the opening of the youth
camp on forms provided and in accordance with procedures established
by the commissioner and shall be accompanied by a fee of eight
hundred fifteen dollars or, if the applicant is a nonprofit, nonstock
corporation or association, a fee of three hundred fifteen dollars or, if
the applicant is a day camp affiliated with a nonprofit organization, for
no more than five days duration and for which labor and materials are
donated, no fee. All such licenses shall be valid for a period of one year
from the date of issuance unless surrendered for cancellation or
SB372 / File No. 280 1

SB372 File No. 280
suspended or revoked by the commissioner for violation of this chapter
or any regulations adopted under section 19a-428, shall be
nontransferable and shall be renewable upon receipt by the
commissioner of a renewal application and payment of an eight-
hundred-fifteen-dollar license fee or, if the licensee is a nonprofit,
nonstock corporation or association, a three-hundred-fifteen-dollar
license fee or, if the applicant is a day camp affiliated with a nonprofit
organization, for no more than five days duration and for which labor
and materials are donated, no fee.
(b) On and after October 1, 2022, any licensee shall require any
prospective employee eighteen years of age or older, who is applying
for a position at a youth camp that requires the provision of care to a
child or involves unsupervised access to a child, to submit to a
comprehensive background check. The background check shall include,
but not be limited to, a (1) (A) criminal history records check conducted
(i) in accordance with section 29-17a, or (ii) by searching the electronic
criminal record system maintained on the Internet web site of the
Judicial Department for convictions matching the prospective
employee's name and date of birth, (B) state child abuse registry
established pursuant to section 17a-101k, (C) registry established and
maintained pursuant to section 54-257, and (D) National Sex Offender
Registry Public Website maintained by the United States Department of
Justice, or (2) check by a third-party provider of national criminal
history record checks that is conducted through a centralized database
utilizing the prospective employee's fingerprints, provided such
provider appears on a list of such providers published on the Internet
web site of the Office of Early Childhood. Prior to each check of the state
child abuse registry conducted pursuant to this subsection, a licensee
shall submit to the office an authorization for the release of personal
information signed by the prospective employee, on a form prescribed
by the office, and the office shall submit such authorization to the
Department of Children and Families. Any prospective employee who
holds a J-1 visa, H-1B visa or R-1 visa issued by the United States
Department of State shall not be required to submit to a background
check under this section.
SB372 / File No. 280 2

SB372 File No. 280
(c) Pending completion of all comprehensive background check
components described in subsection (b) of this section, a prospective
employee may begin work on a provisional basis, provided such
prospective employee is supervised at all times by an employee who
was subjected to a comprehensive background check described in
subsection (b) of this section within the past five years.
(d) Each licensee shall require any employee of a youth camp holding
a position that requires the provision of care to a child or involves
unsupervised access to a child to submit to a comprehensive
background check described in subsection (b) of this section not later
than five years after the date such employee was hired, and at least once
every five years thereafter. Nothing in this section prohibits a licensee
from requiring any such employee to submit to a comprehensive
background check more than once during a five-year period.
(e) The Commissioner of Early Childhood shall have the discretion to
refuse to license under sections 19a-420 to 19a-429, inclusive, a person
to establish, conduct or maintain a youth camp, as described in section
19a-420, or to suspend or revoke the license or take any other action set
forth in any regulation adopted pursuant to section 19a-428 if, the
person who establishes, conducts or maintains such youth camp or a
person employed therein in a position connected with the provision of
care to a child or involving unsupervised access to a child, has (1) been
convicted in this state or any other state of (A) a felony as defined in
section 53a-25 involving the use, attempted use or threatened use of
physical force against another person, (B) cruelty to persons under
section 53-20, (C) injury or risk of injury to or impairing morals of
children under section 53-21, (D) abandonment of children under the
age of six years under section 53-23, (E) any felony where the victim of
the felony is a child under eighteen years of age, or (F) a violation of
section 53a-70b of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to
January 1, 2019, 53a-70, 53a-70a, 53a-71, 53a-72a, 53a-72b or 53a-73a, (2)
a criminal record in this state or any other state that the commissioner
reasonably believes renders the person unsuitable to establish, conduct
or maintain or be employed by a youth camp, or (3) held a license to
SB372 / File No. 280 3

SB372 File No. 280
establish, conduct or maintain a youth camp in another state that was
revoked by such state's licensing authority. However, no refusal of a
license shall be rendered except in accordance with the provisions of
sections 46a-79 to 46a-81, inclusive.
(f) Any person who is licensed to establish, operate or maintain a
youth camp shall notify the Commissioner of Early Childhood if such
licensee or any person employed by such youth camp is convicted of a
crime listed in subsection (e) of this section, if such licensee or person
employed by such youth camp is employed in a position connected with
the provision of care to a child or involving unsupervised access to a
child, immediately upon obtaining knowledge of the conviction. Failure
to comply with the notification requirement may result in the
suspension or revocation of the license or the imposition of any action
set forth in regulation, and shall subject the licensee to a civil penalty of
not more than one hundred dollars per day for each day after the
licensee obtained knowledge of the conviction, provided such civil
100 penalty shall not exceed the aggregate sum of four thousand five
101 hundred dollars.
102 (g) Each licensee shall maintain, and make available for inspection
103 upon request of the Office of Early Childhood, any documentation
104 associated with a comprehensive background check described in
105 subsection (b) of this section, for a period of not less than five years from
106 the date of (1) completion of such background check, if the subject of the
107 comprehensive background check was not hired by the licensee, or (2)
108 separation from employment, if the subject of the comprehensive
109 background check was hired by the licensee.
110 (h) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 368r, the Connecticut
111 Wing Civil Air Patrol within the Department of Emergency Services and
112 Public Protection may establish, conduct or maintain a youth camp
113 without obtaining a license issued by the office, provided the
114 Connecticut Wing Civil Air Patrol (1) establishes, conducts or maintains
115 any such youth camp on property owned or leased by the state and
116 utilizes a facility operated exclusively by the Military Department or the
SB372 / File No. 280 4

SB372 File No. 280
117 armed forces of the United States in accordance with Title 10 of the
118 United States Code, and (2) complies with the guidelines set forth in the
119 Civil Air Patrol pamphlet entitled "CAPP 79-10 Cadet Medication
120 Management", as amended from time to time, during any overnight
121 youth camp.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 19a-421
PS Joint Favorable
SB372 / File No. 280 5

SB372 File No. 280
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Resources of the General Fund GF - Precludes See Below See Below
Potential
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill allows the Connecticut Wing of the Civil Air Patrol (CAP) to
open, operate, and maintain a youth camp without an Office of Early
Childhood (OEC) license.
While the CAP does not currently run a camp in the state, any future
establishment of such a facility precludes the revenue gain from
licensure fees that would otherwise be collected.
For context, standard licensure fees are $815 for for-profit
organizations and $315 for non-profits.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to any changes to the OEC licensure fee
schedule.
SB372 / File No. 280 6

SB372 File No. 280
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 372
AN ACT CONCERNING CONNECTICUT WING CIVIL AIR PATROL
YOUTH CAMPS.